Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6769XC (3) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455B.106 Conservation officers ââ 1 restrictions. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âConservation officerâ means an officer or supervisory 4 personnel authorized under section 456A.13 or a temporary 5 officer appointed pursuant to section 456A.14. 6 b. âHomeâ means any private residence that is owned, leased, 7 used, or occupied, including the curtilage surrounding the 8 residence. 9 c. âOpen fieldsâ means land, excluding any home, that is 10 owned, leased, used, or occupied by a natural person or a 11 nongovernmental entity. 12 d. âPrivate landâ means land that is owned, leased, used, 13 or occupied by a natural person or a nongovernmental entity, 14 including all such lands that would otherwise be considered 15 open fields. 16 2. a. A conservation officer shall not enter a home without 17 a warrant except after receiving the permission of the property 18 owner, lessee, or occupant. 19 b. Unless entering under the exception in paragraph âaâ , 20 the conservation officer shall show the warrant to the property 21 owner, lessee, or occupant if such person is present. 22 3. A conservation officer shall not place a camera or 23 electronic surveillance device that transmits or records images 24 or data in a home or on private land without a warrant except 25 after receiving the permission of the property owner, lessee, 26 or occupant. 27